hr-HR: Razmak prstiju pri pjevanju: Za velike ruke; Za male ruke; Standardni; Ostalo
sl-SI: Razmik med prsti na piščalki za dude: Velike roke; Majhne roke; Standardno; Drugo
tr: Chanter parmak aralığı: Büyük eller; Küçük eller; Standart; Diğer
zh-CN: 风笛吹管指间距: 大手型; 小手型; 标准; 其他
es: Espaciado de los orificios para los dedos del puntero melódico: Manos grandes; Manos pequeñas; Estándar; Otro
bg-BG: Разстояние между отворите за пръстите на мелодичната тръба на гайдата: Големи ръце; Малки ръце; Стандартно; Други
ja: チャンターの指間隔: 大きな手用; 小さな手用; 標準; その他
pt-BR: Espaçamento dos dedos da gaita-de-foles: Mãos grandes; Mãos pequenas; Padrão; Outro
vi: Khoảng cách ngón tay trên ống thổi: Tay lớn; Tay nhỏ; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
ro-RO: Spațierea degetelor pe caraba cimpoiului: Mâini mari; Mâini mici; Standard; Altele
hu: Dallamsíp ujjtávolsága: Nagy kezekhez; Kis kezekhez; Szabványos; Egyéb
en: Chanter finger spacing: Large hands; Small hands; Standard; Other
sv: Avstånd mellan fingrarna på övningssångare: Stora händer; Små händer; Standard; Övrigt
nl: Chanter vingerafstand: Grote handen; Kleine handen; Standaard; Overig
fr: Espacement des trous de la chanterelle: Grandes mains; Petites mains; Standard; Autre
de: Fingerabstand der Spielpfeife: Große Hände; Kleine Hände; Standard; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 風管指孔間距: 大手; 小手; 標準; 其他
th: ระยะห่างระหว่างนิ้วบนตัวเป่า: มือใหญ่; มือเล็ก; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
fi: Melodiaputken (chanterin) sormiaukkojen väli: Suuret kädet; Pienet kädet; Vakio; Muu
lt-LT: Chanter pirštų išdėstymas: Didelėms rankoms; Mažoms rankoms; Standartinis; Kita
sk-SK: Rozstup prstov na píšťale na gajdách: Veľké ruky; Malé ruky; Štandardné; Iné
nb: Avstand mellom sangfinger: Store hender; Små hender; Standard; Annet
el: Απόσταση δακτύλων τραγουδιστή: Μεγάλα χέρια; Μικρά χέρια; Τυπικό; Άλλο
pl: Rozstaw otworów palcowych piszczałki: Duże dłonie; Małe dłonie; Standardowy; Inny
ko: 챈터 손가락 간격: 큰 손용; 작은 손용; 표준; 기타
da: Fingerafstand på chanter: Store hænder; Små hænder; Standard; Andet
ru: Расстояние между отверстиями чантера: Для больших рук; Для маленьких рук; Стандартное; Другое
cs: Rozteč prstů na melodické píšťale: Pro velké ruce; Pro malé ruce; Standardní; Jiné
it: Spaziatura delle dita del cantore: Mani grandi; Mani piccole; Standard; Altro
pt-PT: Espaçamento dos dedos do chanter: Mãos grandes; Mãos pequenas; Padrão; Outro